Maryland, session 2026, HB0247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–1808.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “unwarranted hardship” means that, without a
variance, an applicant would be denied reasonable and significant use of the entire parcel
or lot for which the variance is requested.
(3) (i) A local jurisdiction shall process an application for a variance
regarding a parcel or lot that is subject to a current violation of this subtitle, a regulation
adopted under the authority of this subtitle, or any provision of an order, permit, plan, or
local program in accordance with subsection (c)(1)(iii)15 of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 79 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) In considering an application for a variance, a local jurisdiction
shall presume that the specific development activity in the critical area that is subject to
the application and for which a variance is required does not conform with the general
purpose and intent of this subtitle, regulations adopted under this subtitle, and the
requirements of the local jurisdiction’s program.
(iii) If the variance request is based on conditions or circumstances
that are the result of actions by the applicant, a local jurisdiction shall consider that fact.
(IV) 1. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A NEW
ADDITIONAL OR ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT, AS DEFINED UNDER AN APPROVED
LOCAL CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM.
2. WHEN REQUESTING A VARIANCE FOR A NEW
ACCESSORY STRUCTURE OR USE, A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION EXISTS THAT AN
EXISTING ACCESSORY STRUCTURE OR USE ON THE PARCEL OR LOT DEMONSTRATES
REASONABLE AND SIGNIFICANT USE.
(V) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT ACCEPT AN APPLICATION
FOR A VARIANCE TO:
1. AUTHORIZE A USE THAT IS NOT ALLOWED BY THE
CRITICAL AREA LAND CLASSIFICATION OF THE LOT OR PARCEL;
2. ADJUST THE AMOUNT OR TYPE OF MITIGATION
REQUIRED BY CRITICAL AREA REGULATIONS OR A LOCAL CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM;
OR
3. PROVIDE RELIEF THAT COULD BE OBTAINED
THROUGH AN AVAILABLE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS THAT IS APPROVED AS PART
OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION’S CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM.
(5) (I) A variance to a local jurisdiction’s critical area program may not
be granted unless:
[(i)] 1. Due to special features of a site, or special conditions or
circumstances peculiar to the applicant’s land or structure, a literal enforcement of the
critical area program would result in unwarranted hardship to the applicant;
[(ii)] 2. The local jurisdiction finds that the applicant has satisfied
each one of the variance provisions; [and]
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 79
[(iii)] 3. [Without] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, WITHOUT the variance, the applicant would be deprived of a use of land or
a structure permitted to others in accordance with the provisions of the critical area
program;
4. THE APPLICANT DEMONSTRATES A SUBSTANTIAL
NEED FOR THE VARIANCE THAT IS NOT BASED ON CONVENIENCE, PERSONAL
PREFERENCE, OR FINANCIAL ADVANTAGE; AND
5. THE APPLICANT DEMONSTRATES THAT THE
DEVELOPMENT CANNOT BE LOCATED OUTSIDE A HABITAT PROTECTION AREA.
(II) 1. SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH DOES
NOT APPLY TO A NEW ADDITIONAL OR ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT, AS DEFINED
UNDER AN APPROVED LOCAL CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM.
2. THE APPLICANT MAY MAKE A COMPARISON UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)3 OF THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY TO OTHER PROPERTIES OR
ACCESSORY STRUCTURES THAT:
1. A. ARE LOCATED IN THE CRITICAL AREA;
2. B. WERE DEVELOPED AFTER THE ADOPTION OF THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION’S CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM;
3. C. WERE CONFORMING AND LEGALLY AUTHORIZED AT
THE TIME OF DEVELOPMENT;
4. D. ARE SIMILARLY SITUATED; AND
5. E. IF LOCATED IN A MODIFIED BUFFER AREA, WERE
DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH REQUIREMENTS FOR MODIFIED BUFFER AREAS
UNDER THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S CRITICAL AREA PROGRAM.
(10) A LOCAL BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL:
(I) HEAR ON THE RECORD AN APPEAL OF AN ADMINISTRATIVE
OFFICER’S DECISION ON A CRITICAL AREA VARIANCE APPLICATION; AND
(II) GRANT DEFERENCE TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER’S
FINDINGS OF FACT.
– 3 –

Ch. 79 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –